Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
SURVEY OF RETURNS - NONPARTISAN ELECTIONS

1-10-201. Canvass of nonpartisan elections.

Except as provided for special districts in subsection (1.5) of this section, at least fifteen days before any nonpartisan election that is not coordinated by the county clerk and recorder, the governing body or bodies that called the election shall appoint two registered electors of the political subdivision to serve as members of the canvass board. One of the two persons appointed may be a member of the governing body. The persons so appointed and the designated election official constitute the canvass board for the election. If the election is coordinated between two or more governing bodies, the canvass board shall be appointed in accordance with the intergovernmental agreement between the governing bodies.

(1.5) Unless otherwise directed by the board of directors of a special district, at least fifteen days before any regular special district election, the designated election official shall appoint at least one member of the board of such district and at least one eligible elector of the special district who is not a member of such board to assist the designated election official in the survey of returns. The persons so appointed and the designated election official constitute the board of canvassers for the election.

To the fullest extent possible, no member of the canvass board nor the member's spouse or civil union partner shall have a direct interest in the election.

If for any reason any person appointed as a member of the canvass board refuses, fails, or is unable to serve, that appointed person shall notify the designated election official, who shall appoint another person with the same qualifications, if available, to the canvass board.

Each canvass board member who is not a member of the governing body shall receive a minimum fee of fifteen dollars for each day of service. The fee shall be set by the designated election official and shall be paid by the political subdivision for which the service is performed.

Prior to assuming their duties, the members of the canvass board shall swear or affirm the following: "I, ____________, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a registered elector in the county of ____________ and of the state of Colorado and that I will faithfully perform the duties required of a member of the canvass board."

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 778, § 13, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1170, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 481, § 8, effective July 1; (1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 451, § 8, effective August 4.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 747, § 116, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 99-1268 and House Bill 99-1160 were harmonized.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (2) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-10-202. Canvass of votes in coordinated elections.

For any election coordinated by the county clerk and recorder, the canvass board shall be appointed in accordance with the intergovernmental agreement between the governing bodies holding the election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 778, § 13, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1433, § 111, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 482, § 9, effective July 1.

1-10-203. Official abstract of votes cast - nonpartisan elections.

No later than twenty-two days after an election, the canvass board shall certify to the designated election official the official abstract of votes cast for all candidates, ballot issues, and ballot questions in that election.

If the election is canceled pursuant to section 1-5-208, the designated election official shall note the cancellation and the declared winner on the certified statement of results and the abstract of votes cast, if one is prepared.

If a recount is held and the result of the election changes after the recount, the canvass board shall prepare and certify an amended official abstract of votes cast. If the result of an election subject to a recount does not change after such recount, the canvass board shall include a statement of that fact in the abstract of votes cast.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 778, § 13, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1433, § 112, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1170, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 843, § 67, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 482, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 839, § 26, effective May 5.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1615, § 35, effective May 29.

1-10-204. Imperfect returns.

If the canvass board finds that the method of making or certifying returns from any precinct does not conform to the requirements of law, the returns of the votes cast in that precinct shall nevertheless be canvassed if the returns are sufficiently explicit to enable the canvass board to determine how many votes were cast for each candidate, ballot question, or ballot issue.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 779, § 13, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1171, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 483, § 11, effective July 1.

1-10-205. Corrections.

If the canvass board finds a clerical error or omission in the returns, the board shall consult with the election judges from whom the returns were received to resolve the discrepancies. The election judges shall submit to the canvass board any documentation for verification of the additions and corrections, and the canvass board shall make any additions and corrections required by the facts of the case. The canvass board may adjourn from day to day for the purpose of obtaining the corrections and additions.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 779, § 13, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 483, § 12, effective July 1.